Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-182
State bank; conversion, merger, or consolidation with a national bank; objecting stockholders; stock; payment.

The owner of shares of a state bank which were voted against a conversion into or a merger or consolidation with a national bank under section 8-181 shall be entitled to receive, from the assets of such state bank, the value of such stock in cash, when the conversion, merger, or consolidation becomes effective, upon written demand made to the resulting bank at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the conversion, merger, or consolidation, accompanied by the surrender of the stock certificates. The value of such shares shall be determined, as of the date of the shareholders' meeting approving the conversion, merger, or consolidation, by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the shares voting against the conversion, merger, or consolidation, one by the board of directors of the resulting state bank, and the third by the two so chosen. If the appraisal is not completed within sixty days after the conversion, merger, or consolidation becomes effective the department shall cause an appraisal to be made and such appraisal shall then govern. The expenses of appraisal shall be paid by the resulting bank.

Laws 1951, c. 11, § 1(5), p. 85;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-165.04;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 82, p. 166;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 77.